Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.820

Temporary salary reductions—Exceptions—Implementation.

(1) Except as provided in this section, from July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, base salaries are reduced three percent for all state employees of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches, including those employees in the Washington management service and employees not subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) The following employees of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches are not subject to subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Elected officials whose salaries are set by the commission on salaries for elected officials;

(b) Employees at state institutions of higher education;

(c) Certificated employees of the state school for the blind and the *center for childhood deafness and hearing loss;

(d) Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol represented by the state patrol troopers association and the Washington state patrol lieutenants association;

(e) Represented ferry workers of the Washington state department of transportation; and

(f) Employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary is less than two thousand five hundred dollars per month.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if an employee subject to the three percent salary reduction under subsection (1) of this section is entitled to leave, the employee will receive temporary salary reduction leave of up to five and two-tenths hours per month. The director of the department of personnel shall adopt rules governing the accrual and use of temporary salary reduction leave for nonrepresented employees. For represented employees, the accrual and use of temporary salary reduction leave shall be in accordance with the provisions of the collective bargaining agreements.

(4) If provisions of collective bargaining agreements prevent the implementation of subsection (1) of this section, agencies of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches shall achieve a three percent salary reduction for each employee through employee leave without pay, mandatory and voluntary temporary layoffs, reduced work hours, or other actions consistent with collective bargaining agreements. This subsection does not prohibit an agency from granting temporary salary reduction leave for employees entitled to leave in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Subsection (2) of this section does not prohibit employers of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches from implementing a salary reduction for employees exempted under subsection (2) of this section. Employers of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches are encouraged to implement a salary reduction for employees exempted under subsection (2) of this section, except for those employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary is less than two thousand five hundred dollars per month.

(6) Subsection (2) of this section does not prohibit elected officials whose salaries are set by the commission on salaries for elected officials to voluntarily agree to a reduction in salary and elected officials are encouraged to take such action.

(7) This section does not prohibit a state agency or institution during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium from instituting reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, reductions in salaries, or temporary layoffs as an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. This subsection must be implemented consistent with collective bargaining agreements.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss" was renamed the "Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth" by 2019 c 266 s 1.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2011." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 15.]